North Carolina statutes. Constitution of North Carolina
Article IX Education

§ 1. Education encouraged.

Religion, morality, and knowledge being necessary to good government and the happiness of mankind, schools, libraries, and the means of education shall forever be encouraged.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. IX, § 1, Const. 1868.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on the public purpose doctrine, see 3 Wake Forest Intra. L. Rev. 37 (1967).

For comment, “The State and Sectarian Education: Regulation to Deregulation,” see 1980 Duke L.J. 801.

For note, “Delconte v. State: Some Thoughts on Home Education,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1302 (1986).

For a survey of 1996 developments in constitutional law, see 75 N.C.L. Rev. 2252 (1997).

For article, “Outlawed and Exiled:
Zero Tolerance and Second Generation Race Discrimination in Public Schools,” see 29 N.C. Cent. L.J. 147 (2007).

For article, “The Education Duty,” see 47 Wake Forest L. Rev. 705 (2012).

For note, “The Class is Greener on the Other Side:
How Private Donations to Public Schools Play Into Fair Funding,” see 67 Duke L.J. 427 (2017).

§ 2. Uniform system of schools.

General and uniform system: term.— The General Assembly shall provide by taxation and otherwise for a general and uniform system of free public schools, which shall be maintained at least nine months in every year, and wherein equal opportunities shall be provided for all students.

Local responsibility.— The General Assembly may assign to units of local government such responsibility for the financial support of the free public schools as it may deem appropriate. The governing boards of units of local government with financial responsibility for public education may use local revenues to add to or supplement any public school or post-secondary school program.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

Cross references.

As to establishment of a uniform school system, see

G.S. 115C-1

.

History Note.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section are similar to those of Art. IX, § 2, Const. 1868, as amended by the Convention of 1875. Subsection (2) of this section corresponds to Art. IX, § 3, Const. 1868. That section, as amended in 1918, provided that each county should be divided into districts, in which one or more public schools should be maintained at least six months in every year, and made county commissioners liable to indictment for failure to comply with the section.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1979 administrative law, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1185 (1980).

For survey of 1980 constitutional law, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1116 (1981).

For survey of 1981 constitutional law, see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 1272 (1982).

For note, “State v. Whittle Communications: Allowing Local School Boards to Turn on ‘Channel One’,” see 70 N.C.L. Rev. 1929 (1992).

For a survey of 1996 developments in constitutional law, see 75 N.C.L. Rev. 2252 (1997).

For note on Leandro v. State,

346 N.C. 336

, 488 S.E.2d 249 (1997), annotated under this section, see 76 N.C.L. Rev. 1481 (1998).

For article, “Leandro v. State and the Constitutional Limitation on School Suspensions and Expulsions in North Carolina,” see 83 N.C. L. Rev. 1507 (2005).

For article, “Looking to the Future:
Legal and Policy Options for Racially Integrated Education in the South and the Nation:
The Future is Now:
Legal and Policy Options for Racially Integrated Education,” see 88 N.C. L. Rev. 713 (2010).

For article, “Looking to the Future:
Legal and Policy Options for Racially Integrated Education in the South and the Nation:
Racially Integrated Education and the Role of the Federal Government,” see 88 N.C. L. Rev. 725 (2010).

For article, “Looking to the Future:
Legal and Policy Options for Racially Integrated Education in the South and the Nation:
Resurrecting the Promise of Brown:
Understanding and Remedying How the Supreme Court Reconstitutionalized Segregated Schools,” see 88 N.C. L. Rev. 787 (2010).

For article, “Looking to the Future:
Legal and Policy Options for Racially Integrated Education in the South and the Nation:
After Unitary Status:
Examining Voluntary Integration Strategies for Southern School Districts,” see 88 N.C. L. Rev. 877 (2010).

For article, “Looking to the Future:
Legal and Policy Options for Racially Integrated Education in the South and the Nation:
Pursuing Educational Opportunities for Latino/a Students,” see 88 N.C. L. Rev. 911 (2010).

For article, “Looking to the Future:
Legal and Policy Options for Racially Integrated Education in the South and the Nation:
Integrated Education and Mathematics Outcomes:
A Synthesis of Social Science Research,” see 88 N.C. L. Rev. 993 (2010).

For article, “Looking to the Future:
Legal and Policy Options for a Racially Integrated Education in the South and the Nation:
Altering Grade Configurations in Virginia Schools:
Reducing School Segregation Without Necessarily Considering Race in Light of the Parents Involved Ruling,” see 88 N.C. L. Rev. 1091 (2010).

For article, “Looking to the Future:
Legal and Policy Options for a Racially Integrated Education in the South and the Nation: Still Swimming Against the Resegregation Tide? A Suburban Southern School District in the Aftermath of Parents Involved,” see 88 N.C. L. Rev. 1145 (2010).

For article, “The Education Duty,” see 47 Wake Forest L. Rev. 705 (2012).

For comment, “Charter Schools, EMOs, and Sovereign Immunity,” see 99 N.C.L. Rev. 753 (2021).

§ 3. School attendance.

The General Assembly shall provide that every child of appropriate age and of sufficient mental and physical ability shall attend the public schools, unless educated by other means.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. IX, § 11, Const. 1868, as amended in 1942.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on state regulation of private religious schools, see 16 Wake Forest L. Rev. 405 (1980).

For note, “Delconte v. State: Some Thoughts on Home Education,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1302 (1986).

For comment, “The Latest Home Education Challenge: The Relationship Between Home Schools and Public Schools,” see 74 N.C.L. Rev. 1913 (1996).

§ 4. State Board of Education.

Board.— The State Board of Education shall consist of the Lieutenant Governor, the Treasurer, and eleven members appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the General Assembly in joint session. The General Assembly shall divide the State into eight educational districts. Of the appointive members of the Board, one shall be appointed from each of the eight educational districts and three shall be appointed from the State at large. Appointments shall be for overlapping terms of eight years. Appointments to fill vacancies shall be made by the Governor for the unexpired terms and shall not be subject to confirmation.

Superintendent of Public Instruction.— The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall be the secretary and chief administrative officer of the State Board of Education.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

Cross references.

As to the Superintendent of Public Instruction, see

G.S. 115C-18

et seq.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. IX, § 8, Const. 1868, as amended in 1942 and 1944.

Legal Periodicals.

For a survey of 1996 developments in constitutional law, see 75 N.C.L. Rev. 2252 (1997).

§ 5. Powers and duties of Board.

The State Board of Education shall supervise and administer the free public school system and the educational funds provided for its support, except the funds mentioned in Section 7 of this Article, and shall make all needed rules and regulations in relation thereto, subject to laws enacted by the General Assembly.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. IX, § 9, Const. 1868, as amended in 1942.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on state regulation of private religious schools, see 16 Wake Forest L. Rev. 405 (1980).

For article, “The Pearl in the Oyster: The Public Trust Doctrine in North Carolina,” see 12 Campbell L. Rev. 23 (1989).

For a survey of 1996 developments in constitutional law, see 75 N.C.L. Rev. 2252 (1997).

§ 6. State school fund.

The proceeds of all lands that have been or hereafter may be granted by the United States to this State, and not otherwise appropriated by this State or the United States; all moneys, stocks, bonds, and other property belonging to the State for purposes of public education; the net proceeds of all sales of the swamp lands belonging to the State; and all other grants, gifts, and devises that have been or hereafter may be made to the State, and not otherwise appropriated by the State or by the terms of the grant, gift, or devise, shall be paid into the State Treasury and, together with so much of the revenue of the State as may be set apart for that purpose, shall be faithfully appropriated and used exclusively for establishing and maintaining a uniform system of free public schools.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. IX, § 4, Const. 1868, as amended by the Convention of 1875.

Legal Periodicals.

For a survey of 1996 developments in constitutional law, see 75 N.C.L. Rev. 2252 (1997).

For note, “Will North Carolina Vouch for Zelman? Examining the Constitutionality of School Vouchers in North Carolina in the Wake of Zelman v. Simons-Harris,” see 81 N.C.L. Rev. 2419 (2003).

§ 7. County school fund; State fund for certain moneys.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, all moneys, stocks, bonds, and other property belonging to a county school fund, and the clear proceeds of all penalties and forfeitures and of all fines collected in the several counties for any breach of the penal laws of the State, shall belong to and remain in the several counties, and shall be faithfully appropriated and used exclusively for maintaining free public schools.

The General Assembly may place in a State fund the clear proceeds of all civil penalties, forfeitures, and fines which are collected by State agencies and which belong to the public schools pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. Moneys in such State fund shall be faithfully appropriated by the General Assembly, on a per pupil basis, to the counties, to be used exclusively for maintaining free public schools.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1; 2003-423, s. 1.

Cross references.

As to allocation of revenues to local school administrative units, and definition of “clear proceeds,” as referred to in this section, see

G.S. 115C-437

.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. IX, § 5, Const. 1868, as added by the Convention of 1875.

§ 8. Higher education.

The General Assembly shall maintain a public system of higher education, comprising The University of North Carolina and such other institutions of higher education as the General Assembly may deem wise. The General Assembly shall provide for the selection of trustees of The University of North Carolina and of the other institutions of higher education, in whom shall be vested all the privileges, rights, franchises, and endowments heretofore granted to or conferred upon the trustees of these institutions. The General Assembly may enact laws necessary and expedient for the maintenance and management of The University of North Carolina and the other public institutions of higher education.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. IX, § 6, Const. 1868, as added in 1872 — 1873.

§ 9. Benefits of public institutions of higher education.

The General Assembly shall provide that the benefits of The University of North Carolina and other public institutions of higher education, as far as practicable, be extended to the people of the State free of expense.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. IX, § 7, Const. 1868.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on state regulation of private religious schools, see 16 Wake Forest L. Rev. 405 (1980).

For note, “Practicable and Justiciable:
Why North Carolina’s Constitutional Vision of Higher Education Is Judicially Enforceable,” see 68 Duke L.J. 371 (2018).

§ 10. Escheats.

Escheats prior to July 1, 1971.— All property that prior to July 1, 1971, accrued to the State from escheats, unclaimed dividends, or distributive shares of the estates of deceased persons shall be appropriated to the use of The University of North Carolina.

Escheats after June 30, 1971.— All property that, after June 30, 1971, shall accrue to the State from escheats, unclaimed dividends, or distributive shares of the estates of deceased persons shall be used to aid worthy and needy students who are residents of this State and are enrolled in public institutions of higher education in this State. The method, amount, and type of distribution shall be prescribed by law.

History.

1969, c. 827, s. 1; c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. IX, § 7, Const. 1868.